Hawaii statutes.
§805-10 Same; summons, service. The
summons shall be served by delivering a copy thereof, and showing the original
to the president or other head of the corporation, or to the secretary,
treasurer, or managing agent thereof. [L 1893-4, c 24, §2; RL 1925, §4014; RL
1935, §5474; RL 1945, §10777; RL 1955, §257-10; HRS §710-10; ren L 1972, c 9,
pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Obtaining the appearance of defendant, see HRPP rule 9.

Case Notes

Cited: 41 H. 348 (1956).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next